Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,144
Nail technology salon license; revoked or expired; effect.

A nail technology salon license that has been revoked or expired for any reason shall not be reinstated. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such salon may reopen for business.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 64;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,215;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 406.